California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(A) The hydroelectric generation facility has, within the immediately preceding 15 years, received certification from the State Water Resources Control Board pursuant to Section 401 of the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1341), or has received certification from a regional board to which the state board has delegated authority to issue certification, unless the facility
 is not subject to certification because there is no potential for discharge into waters of the United States.

(B) If the hydroelectric facility is not located in California, the certification pursuant to Section 401 of the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1341) may be received from the applicable state board or agency or from a regional board to which the state board has delegated authority to issue the certification.

(C) If the hydroelectric generation facility is the Rock Creek Powerhouse, Federal Energy Regulatory Commission Project Number 1962, the efficiency improvements have received any necessary incremental certification from the State Water Resources Control Board.

(3) The hydroelectric generation facility is owned by a retail seller or a local publicly owned electric utility, was operational prior to
 January 1, 2007, the efficiency improvements are initiated on or after January 1, 2008, the efficiency improvements are not the result of routine maintenance activities, as determined by the Energy Commission, and the efficiency improvements were not included in any resource plan sponsored by the facility owner prior to January 1, 2008.

(4) All of the incremental increase in electricity resulting from the efficiency improvements are demonstrated to result from a long-term financial commitment by the retail seller or local publicly owned electric utility. For purposes of this paragraph, “long-term financial commitment” means either new ownership investment in the facility by the retail seller or local publicly owned electric utility or a new or renewed contract with a term of 10 or more years, which includes procurement of the incremental generation.

(c) The incremental increase in
 the amount of electricity generated from a hydroelectric generation facility as a result of efficiency improvements at the facility are not eligible for supplemental energy payments pursuant to the Renewable Energy Resources Program (Chapter 8.6 (commencing with Section 25740) of Division 15 of the Public Resources Code), or a successor program.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 399.12 and subdivisions (a) and (b), a hydroelectric generation facility that is an eligible renewable energy resource pursuant to this article as of January 1, 2010, shall not lose its eligibility if the facility causes a change in the volume or timing of streamflow required by license conditions approved pursuant to the Federal Power Act (Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 791a) of Title 16 of the United States Code) on or after January 1, 2010.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 240.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

399.12.6.

(a) (1) Any procurement of biomethane delivered through a common carrier pipeline under a contract executed by a retail seller or local publicly owned electric utility and reported to the Energy Commission prior to March 29, 2012, and otherwise eligible under the rules in place as of the date of contract execution shall count toward the procurement requirements established in this article, under the rules in place at the time the contract was executed, including the Fourth Edition of the Energy Commission’s Renewables Portfolio Standard Eligibility Guidebook, provided that those rules shall apply only to sources that are producing biomethane and injecting it into a common carrier pipeline on or before April 1, 2014.

(2) The eligibility requirements of subdivision (b) shall apply beginning March 29, 2012, to any quantities of biomethane associated with any of the following:

(A) An extension of the term of the original contract.

(B) Any quantity of biomethane that exceeds the quantities of biomethane specified in the original contract.

(C) Any optional quantities of biomethane that can be exercised at the discretion of the buyer.

(D) Any change in the source or sources of biomethane identified in the original contract or the original application for certification submitted to the Energy Commission.

(E) Any quantity of biomethane from a source
 not producing and capturing biomethane and injecting it into a common carrier pipeline on or before April 1, 2014.

(F) The conditions of this paragraph shall apply beginning March 29, 2012.

(b) For contracts initially executed on or after March 29, 2012, or for quantities of biomethane associated with contract amendments executed on or after March 29, 2012, the use of biomethane by a generating facility shall not qualify as an eligible renewable energy resource unless it satisfies all applicable requirements established by the Energy Commission and meets any of the following requirements:

(1) The biomethane is used by an onsite generating facility.

(2) The biomethane is used by an offsite generating facility and delivered to the generating facility
 through a dedicated pipeline.

(3) The biomethane is delivered to a generating facility through a common carrier pipeline and meets all of the following requirements:

(A) The source of biomethane injects the biomethane into a common carrier pipeline that physically flows within California or toward the generating facility for which the biomethane was procured under the original contract.

(B) The source of biomethane did not inject biomethane into a common carrier pipeline prior to March 29, 2012, or the source commenced injection of sufficient incremental quantities of biomethane after March 29, 2012, to satisfy the contract requirements.

(C) The seller or purchaser of the biomethane demonstrates that the capture and injection of biomethane into a common
 carrier pipeline directly results in at least one of the following environmental benefits to California:

(i) The reduction or avoidance of the emission of any criteria air pollutant in California.

(ii) The reduction or avoidance of pollutants that could have an adverse impact on waters of the state.

(iii) The alleviation of a local nuisance within California that is associated with the emission of odors.

(c) For all electricity products generated using biomethane that are credited toward the renewables portfolio standard procurement obligations established pursuant to this article, sufficient renewable and environmental attributes of biomethane production and capture shall be transferred to the retail seller or local publicly owned electric utility that
 uses that biomethane to ensure that there are zero net emissions associated with the production of electricity from the generating facility using the biomethane. The provisions of this subdivision shall be applied in a manner consistent with the definition of “green attributes” as specified by the commission in Decision 08-08-028, Decision on Definition and Attributes of Renewable Energy Credits for Compliance with the California Renewables Portfolio Standard (August 21, 2008), as may be modified by subsequent decision of the commission.

(d) All sellers and purchasers of biomethane shall comply with a system for tracking and verifying the use of biomethane, as established by the Energy Commission, that is equivalent to the system required by subdivision (c) of Section 399.25.

(e) For contracts initially executed on or after March 29, 2012, or for quantities of biomethane
 associated with contract amendments executed after March 29, 2012, the use of biomethane shall be assigned to the appropriate portfolio content category based on the application of the criteria in subdivision (b) of Section 399.16 to the procurement of electricity by the retail seller or local publicly owned electric utility from the generating facility consuming the biomethane.

(f) A retail seller, local publicly owned electric utility, or an intermediary party to a biomethane procurement contract shall not make a marketing, regulatory, or retail claim that asserts that a biomethane procurement contract to which that entity was a party resulted, or will result, in greenhouse gas reductions related to the destruction of methane if the capture and destruction is required by law. If the capture and destruction of the biomethane is not required by law, a retail seller, local publicly owned electric utility, or an intermediary party to a biomethane
 procurement contract shall not make a marketing, regulatory, or retail claim that asserts that a biomethane procurement contract to which that entity was a party resulted, or will result, in greenhouse gas reductions related to the destruction of methane, unless the environmental attributes associated with the capture and destruction of the biomethane pursuant to that contract are transferred to the retail seller or publicly owned electric utility that purchased that biomethane and retired on behalf of the retail customers consuming the electricity associated with the use of that biomethane, or unless the biomethane procurement contract prohibits the source of biomethane from separately marketing the environmental attributes associated with the capture and destruction of the biomethane sold pursuant to that contract. These attributes shall be retired and may not be resold.

(g) For the purposes of this section, “biomethane” means landfill gas or
 digester gas, consistent with Section 25741 of the Public Resources Code.

(h) If any provision of this section or the application of any provision of this section is held invalid, biomethane delivered through a common carrier pipeline pursuant to a contract executed within 180 days of, or at any time subsequent to, the invalidation of that provision shall not qualify as an eligible renewable energy resource.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 605, Sec. 2.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

399.13.

(a) (1) The commission shall direct each electrical corporation to annually prepare a renewable energy procurement plan that includes the elements specified in paragraph (6), to satisfy its obligations under the renewables portfolio standard. To the extent feasible, this procurement plan shall be proposed, reviewed, and adopted by the commission as part of, and pursuant to, a general procurement plan process. The commission shall require each electrical corporation to review and update its renewable energy procurement plan as it determines to be necessary. The commission shall require all other retail sellers to prepare and submit renewable energy procurement plans that address the requirements identified in paragraph
 (6).

(2) (A) Every electrical corporation that owns electrical transmission facilities shall annually prepare, as part of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission Order 890 process, and submit to the commission, a report identifying any electrical transmission facility, upgrade, or enhancement that is reasonably necessary to achieve the renewables portfolio standard procurement requirements of this article. Each report shall look forward at least five years and, to ensure that adequate investments are made in a timely manner, shall include a preliminary schedule when an application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity will be made, pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1001), for any electrical transmission facility identified as being reasonably necessary to achieve the renewable energy resources procurement
 requirements of this article. Each electrical corporation that owns electrical transmission facilities shall ensure that project-specific interconnection studies are completed in a timely manner.

(B) Each electrical corporation that owns electrical transmission facilities shall annually prepare, and submit to the commission, a report on any changes to previously reported in-service dates of transmission and interconnection facilities necessary to provide transmission deliverability to eligible renewable energy resources or energy storage resources that have executed interconnection
 agreements. The report shall be provided concurrently with each electrical corporation’s annual renewable energy procurement plan and identify the reason for any changes to the status of in-service dates.

(3) The commission shall direct each retail seller to prepare and submit an annual compliance report that includes all of the following:

(A) The current status and progress made during the prior year toward procurement of eligible renewable energy resources as a percentage of retail sales, including, if applicable, the status of any necessary siting and permitting approvals from federal, state, and local agencies for those eligible renewable
 energy resources
 procured by the retail seller, and the current status of compliance with the portfolio content requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 399.16, including procurement of eligible renewable energy resources located outside the state and within the WECC and unbundled renewable energy credits.

(B) If the retail seller is an electrical corporation, the current status and progress made during the prior year toward construction of, and upgrades to, transmission and distribution facilities and other electrical system components it owns to interconnect eligible renewable energy resources and to supply the electricity generated by those resources to load, including the status of planning, siting, and permitting transmission facilities by federal, state, and local agencies.

(C) Recommendations to remove impediments to making progress toward achieving the renewable energy resources procurement requirements established pursuant to this article.

(4) The commission shall review each annual compliance report filed by a retail seller. The commission shall notify a retail seller if the commission has determined, based upon its review, that the retail seller may be at risk of not satisfying the renewable energy procurement requirements for the then-current or a future compliance period and shall provide recommendations in that circumstance regarding satisfying those requirements.

(5) The commission shall adopt, by rulemaking, all of the following:

(A) A process that provides criteria for
 the rank ordering and selection of least-cost and best-fit eligible renewable energy resources to comply with the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program obligations on a total cost and best-fit basis. This process shall take into account all of the following:

(i) Estimates of indirect costs associated with needed transmission investments.

(ii) The cost impact of procuring the eligible renewable energy resources on the electrical corporation’s electricity portfolio.

(iii) The viability of the project to construct and reliably operate the eligible renewable energy resource, including the developer’s experience, the feasibility of the technology used to generate electricity, and the risk that the facility will not
 be built, or that construction will be delayed, with the result that electricity will not be supplied as required by the contract.

(iv) Workforce recruitment, training, and retention efforts, including the employment growth associated with the construction and operation of eligible renewable energy resources and goals for recruitment and training of women, minorities, and disabled veterans.

(v) (I) Estimates of electrical corporation expenses resulting from integrating and operating eligible renewable energy resources, including, but not limited to, any additional wholesale energy and capacity costs associated with integrating each eligible renewable resource.

(II) No later than December 31,
 2015, the commission shall approve a methodology for determining the integration costs described in subclause (I).

(vi) Consideration of any statewide greenhouse gas emissions limit established pursuant to the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code).

(vii) Consideration of capacity and system reliability of the eligible renewable energy resource to ensure grid reliability.

(B) Rules permitting retail sellers to accumulate, beginning January 1, 2011, excess procurement in one compliance period to be applied to any subsequent compliance period. The rules shall apply equally to all retail sellers. In determining the quantity of excess
 procurement for the applicable compliance period, the commission shall retain the rules adopted by the commission and in effect as of January 1, 2015, for the compliance period specified in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 399.15. For any subsequent compliance period, the rules shall allow the following:

(i) For electricity products meeting the portfolio content requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 399.16, contracts of any duration may count as excess procurement.

(ii) Electricity products meeting the portfolio content requirements of paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 399.16 shall not be counted as excess procurement. Contracts of any duration for electricity products meeting the portfolio content
 requirements of paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 399.16 that are credited towards a compliance period shall not be deducted from a retail seller’s procurement for purposes of calculating excess procurement.

(iii) If a retail seller notifies the commission that it will comply with the provisions of subdivision (b) for the compliance period
 beginning January 1, 2017, the provisions of clauses (i) and (ii) shall take effect for that retail seller for that compliance period.

(C) Standard terms and conditions to be used by all electrical corporations in contracting for eligible renewable energy resources, including performance requirements for renewable generators. A contract for the purchase of electricity generated by an eligible renewable energy resource, at a minimum, shall include the renewable energy credits associated with all electricity generation specified under the contract. The standard terms and conditions shall include the requirement that, no later than six months after the commission’s approval of an electricity purchase agreement entered into pursuant to this article, the following information about the agreement shall be disclosed by the commission: party names,
 resource type, project location, and project capacity.

(D) An appropriate minimum margin of procurement above the minimum procurement level necessary to comply with the renewables portfolio standard to mitigate the risk that renewable projects planned or under contract are delayed or canceled. This paragraph does not preclude an electrical corporation from voluntarily proposing a margin of procurement above the appropriate minimum margin established by the commission.

(6) Consistent with the goal of increasing California’s reliance on eligible renewable energy resources, the renewable energy procurement plan shall include all of the following:

(A) An assessment of annual or multiyear portfolio supplies and demand to
 determine the optimal mix of eligible renewable energy resources with deliverability characteristics that may include peaking, dispatchable, baseload, firm, and as-available capacity.

(B) Potential compliance delays related to the conditions described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 399.15.

(C) A bid solicitation setting forth the need for eligible renewable energy resources of each deliverability characteristic, required online dates, and locational preferences, if any.

(D) A status update on the development schedule of all eligible renewable energy resources currently under contract.

(E) Consideration of mechanisms for price adjustments associated
 with the costs of key components for eligible renewable energy resource projects with online dates more than 24 months after the date of contract execution.

(F) An assessment of the risk that an eligible renewable energy resource will not be built, or that construction will be delayed, with the result that electricity will not be delivered as required by the contract.

(7) In soliciting and procuring eligible renewable energy resources, each electrical corporation shall offer contracts of no less than 10 years duration, unless the commission approves of a contract of shorter duration.

(8) (A) In soliciting and procuring eligible renewable energy resources for California-based projects, each electrical
 corporation shall give preference to renewable energy projects that provide environmental and economic benefits to communities afflicted with poverty or high unemployment, or that suffer from high emission levels of toxic air contaminants, criteria air pollutants, and greenhouse gases.

(B) Subparagraph (A) applies to all procurement of eligible renewable energy resources for California-based projects, whether the procurement occurs through all-source requests for offers, eligible renewable resources only requests for offers, or other procurement mechanisms. This subparagraph is declaratory of existing law.

(9) In soliciting and procuring eligible renewable energy resources, each retail seller shall consider the best-fit attributes of resource types that ensure a balanced
 resource mix to maintain the reliability of the electrical grid.

(b) (1) A retail seller may enter into a combination of long- and short-term contracts for electricity and associated renewable energy credits. Beginning January 1, 2021, at least 65 percent of the procurement a retail seller counts toward the renewables portfolio standard requirement of each compliance period shall be from its contracts of 10 years or more in duration or in its ownership or ownership agreements for eligible renewable energy resources.

(2) In demonstrating compliance with paragraph (1), a retail seller may rely on contracts of 10 years or more in duration or ownership agreements entered into before January 1, 2019, directly by its direct access, as described in Section 365.1,
 nonprofit
 educational institution end-use customer for eligible renewable energy resources located in front of the customer meter to satisfy the portion of the compliance requirement attributable to the retail sales to that end-use customer. A retail seller shall furnish to the commission documentation deemed necessary by the commission to verify compliance with this paragraph.

(c) The commission shall review and accept, modify, or reject each electrical corporation’s renewable energy resource procurement plan prior to the commencement of renewable energy procurement pursuant to this article by an electrical corporation. The commission shall assess adherence to the approved renewable energy resource procurement plans in determining compliance with the obligations of this article.

(d) Unless previously preapproved by the commission, an electrical corporation shall submit a contract for the generation of an eligible renewable energy resource to the commission for review and approval consistent with an approved renewable energy resource procurement plan. If the commission determines that the bid prices are elevated due to a lack of effective competition among the bidders, the commission shall direct the electrical corporation to renegotiate the contracts or conduct a new solicitation.

(e) If an electrical corporation fails to comply with a commission order adopting a renewable energy resource procurement plan, the commission shall exercise its authority to require compliance.

(f) (1) The commission may authorize a procurement entity to enter
 into contracts on behalf of customers of a retail seller for electricity products from eligible renewable energy resources to satisfy the retail seller’s renewables portfolio standard procurement requirements. The commission shall not require any person or corporation to act as a procurement entity or require any party to purchase eligible renewable energy resources from a procurement entity.

(2) Subject to review and approval by the commission, the procurement entity shall be permitted to recover reasonable administrative and procurement costs through the retail rates of end-use customers that are served by the procurement entity and are directly benefiting from the procurement of eligible renewable energy resources.

(g) Procurement and administrative costs associated with contracts
 entered into by an electrical corporation for eligible renewable energy resources pursuant to this article and approved by the commission are reasonable and prudent and shall be recoverable in rates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 229, Sec. 1.   (SB 1174)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

399.14.

(a) (1) An electrical corporation, pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1001), and in order to meet its unmet renewables portfolio standard procurement requirements, may apply to the commission for approval to construct, own, and operate an eligible renewable energy resource.

(2) If the proposed eligible renewable energy resource complies with the requirements of subdivision (b), the commission shall approve an application filed pursuant to paragraph (1), until the commission has approved applications for eligible renewable energy resources for the electrical corporation that, when constructed and operating, will provide 8.25 percent of the electrical corporation’s
 anticipated retail sales by December 31, 2020, and thereafter.

(3) The commission may approve additional applications for eligible renewable energy resources once the commission has approved sufficient applications for eligible renewable energy resources for the electrical corporation that, when constructed and operating, will provide 8.25 percent of the electrical corporation’s anticipated retail sales by December 31, 2020, and thereafter.

(b) The commission shall not approve any application by an electrical corporation pursuant to subdivision (a) unless both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The eligible renewable energy resource utilizes a viable technology at a reasonable cost.

(2) The eligible renewable energy resource provides comparable or
 superior value to ratepayers when compared to then recent contracts for generation provided by eligible renewable energy resources.

(c) In approving any application by an electrical corporation for approval to construct, own, and operate an eligible renewable energy resource, the commission shall apply traditional cost-of-service ratemaking. When applying traditional cost-of-service ratemaking, the commission, in the certificate authorizing the new construction, shall specify the maximum cost determined to be reasonable and prudent for the construction of the facility and the cost of initial operation of the facility. Upon a filing by the electrical corporation, the commission may authorize an increase in the maximum cost of construction if it determines that the cost has in fact increased, that the cost increase is determined to be reasonable and prudent, and that the present or future public convenience or necessity require construction of
 the project at the increased cost.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 18.   (SB 2 1x)   Effective December 10, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

399.15.

(a) In order to fulfill unmet long-term resource needs, the commission shall establish a renewables portfolio standard requiring all retail sellers to procure a minimum quantity of electricity products from eligible renewable energy resources as a specified percentage of total kilowatthours sold to their retail end-use customers each compliance period to achieve the targets established under this article. For any retail seller procuring at least 14 percent of retail sales from eligible renewable energy resources in 2010, the deficits associated with any previous renewables portfolio standard shall not be added to any procurement requirement pursuant to this article.

(b) The commission shall implement renewables portfolio standard procurement requirements only as
 follows:

(1) Each retail seller shall procure a minimum quantity of eligible renewable energy resources for each of the following compliance periods:

(A) January 1, 2011, to December 31, 2013, inclusive.

(B) January 1, 2014, to December 31, 2016, inclusive.

(C) January 1, 2017, to December 31, 2020, inclusive.

(D) January 1, 2021, to December 31, 2024, inclusive.

(E) January 1, 2025, to December 31, 2027, inclusive.

(F) January 1, 2028, to December 31, 2030, inclusive.

(2) (A) No later than January 1, 2017, the commission shall establish the quantity of electricity products from eligible renewable energy resources to be procured by the retail seller for each compliance period. These quantities shall be established in the same manner for all retail sellers and result in the same percentages used to establish compliance period quantities for all retail sellers.

(B) In establishing quantities for the compliance period from January 1, 2011, to December 31, 2013, inclusive, the commission shall require procurement for each retail seller equal to an average of 20 percent of retail sales. For the following compliance periods, the quantities shall reflect reasonable progress in each of the intervening years sufficient to ensure that the procurement of electricity products from eligible renewable energy resources achieves 25 percent of retail sales by December 31, 2016, 33 percent by December 31, 2020, 44
 percent by December 31, 2024, 52 percent by December 31, 2027, and 60 percent by December 31, 2030. The commission shall establish appropriate three-year compliance periods for all subsequent years that require retail sellers to procure not less than 60 percent of retail sales of electricity products from eligible renewable energy resources.

(C) Retail sellers shall be obligated to procure no less than the quantities associated with all intervening years by the end of each compliance period. Retail sellers shall not be required to demonstrate a specific quantity of procurement for any individual intervening year.

(3) The commission may require the procurement of eligible renewable energy resources in excess of the quantities specified in paragraph (2).

(4) Only for purposes of establishing the renewables portfolio
 standard procurement requirements of paragraph (1) and determining the quantities pursuant to paragraph (2), the commission shall include all electricity sold to retail customers by the Department of Water Resources pursuant to Division 27 (commencing with Section 80000) of the Water Code in the calculation of retail sales by an electrical corporation.

(5) The commission shall waive enforcement of this section if it finds that the retail seller has demonstrated any of the following conditions are beyond the control of the retail seller and will prevent compliance:

(A) There is inadequate transmission capacity to allow for sufficient electricity to be delivered from proposed eligible renewable energy resource projects using the current operational protocols of the Independent System Operator. In making its findings relative to the existence of this condition with respect to a
 retail seller that owns transmission lines, the commission shall consider both of the following:

(i) Whether the retail seller has undertaken, in a timely fashion, reasonable measures under its control and consistent with its obligations under local, state, and federal laws and regulations, to develop and construct new transmission lines or upgrades to existing lines intended to transmit electricity generated by eligible renewable energy resources. In determining the reasonableness of a retail seller’s actions, the commission shall consider the retail seller’s expectations for full-cost recovery for these transmission lines and upgrades.

(ii) Whether the retail seller has taken all reasonable operational measures to maximize cost-effective deliveries of electricity from eligible renewable energy resources in advance of transmission availability.

(B) Permitting, interconnection, or other circumstances that delay procured eligible renewable energy resource projects, or there is an insufficient supply of eligible renewable energy resources available to the retail seller. In making a finding that this condition prevents timely compliance, the commission shall consider whether the retail seller has done all of the following:

(i) Prudently managed portfolio risks, including relying on a sufficient number of viable projects.

(ii) Sought to develop one of the following: its own eligible renewable energy resources, transmission to interconnect to eligible renewable energy resources, or energy storage used to integrate eligible renewable energy resources. This clause shall not require an electrical corporation to pursue development of eligible renewable energy resources
 pursuant to Section 399.14.

(iii) Procured an appropriate minimum margin of procurement above the minimum procurement level necessary to comply with the renewables portfolio standard to compensate for foreseeable delays or insufficient supply.

(iv) Taken reasonable measures, under the control of the retail seller, to procure cost-effective distributed generation and allowable unbundled renewable energy credits.

(C) Unanticipated curtailment of eligible renewable energy resources if the waiver would not result in an increase in greenhouse gas emissions.

(D) Unanticipated increase in retail sales due to transportation electrification. In making a finding that this condition prevents timely compliance, the commission shall consider both of the
 following:

(i) Whether transportation electrification significantly exceeded forecasts in that retail seller’s service territory based on the best and most recently available information filed with the State Air Resources Board, the Energy Commission, or another state agency.

(ii) Whether the retail seller has taken reasonable measures to procure sufficient resources to account for unanticipated increases in retail sales due to transportation electrification.

(6) If the commission waives the compliance requirements of this section, the commission shall establish additional reporting requirements on the retail seller to demonstrate that all reasonable actions under the control of the retail seller are taken in each of the intervening years sufficient to satisfy future procurement requirements.

(7) The commission shall not waive enforcement pursuant to this section, unless the retail seller demonstrates that it has taken all reasonable actions under its control, as set forth in paragraph (5), to achieve full compliance.

(8) If a retail seller fails to procure sufficient eligible renewable energy resources to comply with a procurement requirement pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) and fails to obtain an order from the commission waiving enforcement pursuant to paragraph (5), the commission shall assess penalties for noncompliance. A schedule of penalties shall be adopted by the commission that shall be comparable for electrical corporations and other retail sellers. For electrical corporations, the cost of any penalties shall not be collected in rates. Any penalties collected under this article shall be deposited into the Electric Program Investment Charge Fund and used for
 the purposes described in Chapter 8.1 (commencing with Section 25710) of Division 15 of the Public Resources Code.

(9) Deficits associated with the compliance period shall not be added to a future compliance period.

(c) The commission shall establish a limitation for each electrical corporation on the procurement expenditures for all eligible renewable energy resources used to comply with the renewables portfolio standard. This limitation shall be set at a level that prevents disproportionate rate impacts.

(d) If the cost limitation for an electrical corporation is insufficient to support the projected costs of meeting the renewables portfolio standard procurement requirements, the electrical corporation may refrain from entering into new contracts or constructing facilities beyond the quantity that can be procured
 within the limitation, unless eligible renewable energy resources can be procured without exceeding a de minimis increase in rates, consistent with the long-term procurement plan established for the electrical corporation pursuant to Section 454.5.

(e) (1) The commission shall monitor the status of the cost limitation for each electrical corporation in order to ensure compliance with this article.

(2) If the commission determines that an electrical corporation may exceed its cost limitation prior to achieving the renewables portfolio standard procurement requirements, the commission shall do both of the following within 60 days of making that determination:

(A) Investigate and identify the reasons why the electrical corporation may exceed its annual cost limitation.

(B) Notify the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature that the electrical corporation may exceed its cost limitation, and include the reasons why the electrical corporation may exceed its cost limitation.

(f) The establishment of a renewables portfolio standard shall not constitute implementation by the commission of the federal Public Utility Regulatory Policies Act of 1978 (Public Law 95-617).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 312, Sec. 3.   (SB 100)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

399.16.

(a) Various electricity products from eligible renewable energy resources located within the WECC transmission network service area shall be eligible to comply with the renewables portfolio standard procurement requirements in Section 399.15. These electricity products may be differentiated by their impacts on the operation of the grid in supplying electricity, as well as meeting the requirements of this article.

(b) Consistent with the goals of procuring the least-cost and best-fit electricity products from eligible renewable energy resources that meet project viability principles adopted by the commission pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 399.13 and that provide the benefits set forth in Section 399.11, a balanced portfolio of eligible
 renewable energy resources shall be procured consisting of the following portfolio content categories:

(1) Eligible renewable energy resource electricity products that meet either of the following criteria:

(A) Have a first point of interconnection with a California balancing authority, have a first point of interconnection with distribution facilities used to serve end users within a California balancing authority area, or are scheduled from the eligible renewable energy resource into a California balancing authority without substituting electricity from another source. The use of another source to provide real-time ancillary services required to maintain an hourly or subhourly import schedule into a California balancing authority shall be permitted, but only the fraction of the schedule actually generated by the eligible renewable energy resource shall count toward this
 portfolio content category.

(B) Have an agreement to dynamically transfer electricity to a California balancing authority.

(2) Firmed and shaped eligible renewable energy resource electricity products providing incremental electricity and scheduled into a California balancing authority.
